California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Each law enforcement agency shall develop a system, by January 1, 1986, for recording all domestic violence-related calls for assistance that are made to the department, including whether weapons are involved and whether the incident involved strangulation or suffocation. All domestic violence-related calls for assistance shall be supported with a written incident report, as described in subdivision (c), identifying the domestic violence incident. Monthly, the total number of domestic violence calls received and the numbers of those cases involving weapons or strangulation or suffocation shall be compiled by each law enforcement agency and submitted to the Attorney General.

(b) The Attorney General shall report annually to the Governor, the Legislature, and the
 public the total number of domestic violence-related calls that are received by California law enforcement agencies, the number of cases involving weapons, the number of cases involving strangulation or suffocation, and a breakdown of calls received by agency, city, and county.

(c) Each law enforcement agency shall develop an incident report form that includes a domestic violence identification code by January 1, 1986. In all incidents of domestic violence, a report shall be written and shall be identified on the face of the report as a domestic violence incident. The report shall include at least all of the following:

(1) A notation of whether the officer or officers who responded to the domestic violence call observed signs that the alleged abuser was under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance.

(2) A
 notation of whether the officer or officers who responded to the domestic violence call determined if a law enforcement agency had previously responded to a domestic violence call at the same address involving the same alleged abuser or victim.

(3) A notation of whether the officer or officers who responded to the domestic violence call found it necessary, for the protection of the peace officer or other persons present, to inquire of the victim, the alleged abuser, or both, whether a firearm or other deadly weapon was present at the location, and, if there is an inquiry, whether that inquiry disclosed the presence of a firearm or other deadly weapon. A firearm or other deadly weapon discovered by an officer at the scene of a domestic violence incident shall be subject to confiscation pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Title 2 of Part 6.

(4) A notation of
 whether there were indications that the incident involved strangulation or suffocation. This includes whether a witness or victim reported an incident of strangulation or suffocation, whether a victim reported symptoms of strangulation or suffocation, or whether the officer observed signs of strangulation or suffocation.

(5) A notation of whether the officer or officers who responded to the domestic violence call removed a firearm or other deadly weapon from the location of the domestic violence call.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   (AB 2822)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13731.

(a) The San Diego Association of Governments may serve as the regional clearinghouse for criminal justice data involving domestic violence. The association may obtain monthly crime statistics from all law enforcement agencies in San Diego County. These law enforcement agencies may include their domestic violence supplements in the monthly crime reports that are supplied to the association. The association may obtain client-based data regarding clients or victims of domestic violence who seek protection in San Diego County shelters.

(b) Contingent upon the appropriation of funds therefor, the association shall do all of the following:

(1) Create a standardized, uniform intake form, to be referred to as a Compilation of Research and Evaluation Intake Instrument, also known as C.O.R.E., for use in San Diego County’s domestic violence shelters. This form shall be completed and ready to use in the field for data collection purposes not later than March 31, 1997. The C.O.R.E. intake form shall be standardized to compile the same information from all clients for all shelters.

(2) Collect and analyze the standardized, uniform intake form in order to compile information including, but not limited to, victim sociodemographic characteristics, descriptions of domestic violence incidents pertaining to each victim and services needed by domestic violence shelter clients within San Diego County.

(3) Use the collected client-based data to describe the nature and scope of violence from the perspective of domestic violence shelter clients and to determine the service needs of clients and what gaps in service delivery exist, so that resources can be appropriately targeted and allocated. All data supplied to the association shall be stripped of any information regarding the personal identity of an individual to protect the privacy of domestic violence shelter clients.

(4) Establish an advisory committee in order to facilitate the research effort and to assess the value of the research project. The advisory committee shall consist of representation from the shelters, as well as members of the San Diego County Domestic Violence Council, local justice administrators, and the principal investigator. The advisory committee shall meet at least four times before April 30, 1999, to review the progress of the research, including research methodology, data collection instruments, preliminary analyses, and work product as they are drafted. Advisory committee members shall evaluate the final research product in terms of applicability and utility of findings and recommendations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 163.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13732.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a substantial body of research demonstrates a strong connection between domestic violence and child abuse. However, despite this connection, child abuse and domestic violence services and agencies often fail to coordinate appropriately at the local level. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to improve preventative and supportive services to families experiencing violence in order to prevent further abuse of children and the victims of domestic violence. It is the further intent of this section that child protective services agencies develop a protocol which clearly sets forth the criteria for a child protective services response to a domestic violence related incident in a home in which a child resides.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2003, child protective services agencies, law enforcement, prosecution, child abuse and domestic violence experts, and community-based organizations serving abused children and victims of domestic violence shall develop, in collaboration with one another, protocols as to how law enforcement and child welfare agencies will cooperate in their response to incidents of domestic violence in homes in which a child resides. The requirements of this section shall not apply to counties where protocols consistent with this section already have been developed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 187, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5.3. Family Justice Centers and Multidisciplinary Teams [13750. - 13753.]



  CHAPTER 1. Family Justice Centers [13750. - 13751.]

13750.

(a) A city, county, city and county, or community-based nonprofit organization may each establish a multiagency, multidisciplinary family justice center to assist victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, elder or dependent adult abuse, and human trafficking, to ensure that victims of abuse are able to access all needed services in one location in order to enhance victim safety, increase offender accountability, and improve access to services for victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, elder or dependent adult abuse, and human trafficking.

(b) For purposes of this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Abuse” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6203 of the Family Code.

(2) “Domestic violence” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(3) “Sexual assault” means an act or attempt made punishable by Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 269, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 647.6, or former Section 262 or 288a.

(4) “Elder or dependent adult abuse” means an act made punishable by Section 368.

(5) “Human trafficking” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 236.1.

(c) For purposes of this title, family justice centers shall be defined as
 multiagency, multidisciplinary service centers where public and private agencies assign staff members on a full-time or part-time basis in order to provide services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, elder or dependent adult abuse, or human trafficking from one location in order to reduce the number of times victims must tell their story, reduce the number of places victims must go for help, and increase access to services and support for victims and their children. Staff members at a family justice center may be comprised of, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Law enforcement personnel.

(2) Medical personnel.

(3) District attorneys and city attorneys.

(4) Victim-witness program personnel.

(5) Domestic violence shelter service staff.

(6) Community-based rape crisis, domestic violence, and human trafficking advocates.

(7) Social service agency staff members.

(8) Child welfare agency social workers.

(9) County health department staff.

(10) City or county welfare and public assistance workers.

(11) Nonprofit agency counseling professionals.

(12) Civil legal service
 providers.

(13) Supervised volunteers from partner agencies.

(14) Other professionals providing services.

(d) This section does not abrogate existing laws regarding privacy or information sharing. Family justice center staff members shall comply with the laws governing their respective professions.

(e) Victims of crime shall not be denied services on the grounds of criminal history. A criminal history search shall not be conducted of a victim at a family justice center without the victim’s written consent unless the criminal history search is pursuant to a criminal investigation.

(f) Victims of crime shall
 not be required to participate in the criminal justice system or cooperate with law enforcement in order to receive counseling, medical care, or other services at a family justice center.

(g) (1) Each family justice center shall consult with community-based domestic violence, sexual assault, elder or dependent adult abuse, and human trafficking agencies in partnership with survivors of violence and abuse and their advocates in the operations process of the family justice center, and shall establish procedures for the ongoing input, feedback, and evaluation of the family justice center by survivors of violence and abuse and community-based crime victim service providers and advocates.

(2) Each family justice center shall develop policies and procedures,
 in collaboration with local community-based crime victim service providers and local survivors of violence and abuse, to ensure coordinated services are provided to victims and to enhance the safety of victims and professionals at the family justice center who participate in affiliated survivor-centered support or advocacy groups. Each family justice center shall maintain a formal client feedback, complaint, and input process to address client concerns about services provided or the conduct of any family justice center professionals, agency partners, or volunteers providing services in the family justice center.

(3) Each family justice center shall provide clients with educational materials relating to gun violence restraining orders, domestic violence restraining orders, and other legal avenues of protection for victims and their families, if appropriate.

(h) (1) Each family justice center shall maintain a client consent policy and shall be in compliance with all state and federal laws protecting the confidentiality of the types of information and documents that may be in a victim’s file, including, but not limited to, medical, legal, and victim counselor records. Each family justice center shall have a designated privacy officer to develop and oversee privacy policies and procedures consistent with state and federal privacy laws and the Fair Information Practice Principles promulgated
 by the United States Department of Homeland Security. At no time shall a victim be required to sign a client consent form to share information in order to access services.

(2) Each family justice center is required to obtain informed, written, reasonably time limited, consent from the victim before sharing information obtained from the victim with any staff member or agency partner, except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4).

(3) A family justice center is not required to obtain consent from the victim before sharing information obtained from the victim with any staff member or agency partner if the person is a mandated reporter, a peace officer, or a member of the prosecution team and is required to report or disclose specific information or incidents. These persons shall
 inform the victim that they may share information obtained from the victim without the victim’s consent.

(4) Each family justice center is required to inform the victim that information shared with staff members or partner agencies at a family justice center may be shared with law enforcement professionals without the victim’s consent if there is a mandatory duty to report, or the client is a danger to themselves or others. Each family justice center shall obtain written acknowledgment that the victim has been informed of this policy.

(5) Consent by a victim for sharing information within a family justice center pursuant to this section shall not be construed as a universal waiver of any existing evidentiary privilege that makes confidential any communications or documents between the
 victim and any service provider, including, but not limited to, any lawyer, advocate, sexual assault or domestic violence counselor as defined in Section 1035.2 or 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, human trafficking caseworker as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, therapist, doctor, or nurse. Any oral or written communication or any document authorized by the victim to be shared for the purposes of enhancing safety and providing more effective and efficient services to the victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, elder or dependent adult abuse, or human trafficking shall not be disclosed to any third party, unless that third-party disclosure is authorized by the victim, or required by other state or federal law or by court order.

(i) An individual staff member, volunteer, or agency that has victim information governed by
 this section shall not be required to disclose that information unless the victim has consented to the disclosure or it is otherwise required by other state or federal law or by court order.

(j) A disclosure of information consented to by the victim in a family justice center, made for the purposes of clinical assessment, risk assessment, safety planning, or service delivery, shall not be deemed a waiver of any privilege or confidentiality provision contained in Sections 2263, 2918, 4982, and 6068 of the Business and Professions Code, the lawyer-client privilege protected by Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the physician-patient privilege protected by Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the psychotherapist-patient privilege
 protected by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, the sexual assault counselor-victim privilege protected by Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 1035) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, or the domestic violence counselor-victim privilege protected by Article 8.7 (commencing with Section 1037) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   (AB 2137)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13751.

Each family justice center established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13750 shall maintain a formal training program with mandatory training for all staff members, volunteers, and agency professionals of not less than eight hours per year on subjects, including, but not limited to, privileges and confidentiality, information sharing, risk assessment, safety planning, victim advocacy, and high-risk case response.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (AB 1623)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Multidisciplinary Teams [13752. - 13753.]

13752.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, city and county, or community-based nonprofit organization may establish a domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel team consisting of two or more persons who are trained in the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of domestic violence cases and who are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to domestic violence.

(b) A domestic violence multidisciplinary team may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Law enforcement personnel.

(2) Medical personnel.

(3) Psychiatrists, psychologists, marriage and family therapists, or other trained counseling personnel.

(4) District attorneys and city attorneys.

(5) Victim-witness program personnel.

(6) Sexual assault counselors, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code.

(7) Domestic violence counselors, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(8) Social service agency staff members.

(9) Child welfare agency social workers.

(10) County health department staff.

(11) City or county welfare and public assistance workers.

(12) Nonprofit agency counseling professionals.

(13) Civil legal service providers.

(14) Human trafficking caseworkers, as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, following a report of suspected domestic violence, members of a
 domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the prevention, identification, and treatment of domestic violence may disclose to and exchange with one another information and writings that relate to any incident of domestic violence that may also be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the prevention, identification, or treatment of domestic violence. Any discussion relative to the disclosure or exchange of the information or writings during a team meeting is confidential, and testimony concerning that discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding unless required by law.

(2) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section may occur telephonically or
 electronically if there is adequate verification of the identity of the domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel who are involved in that disclosure or exchange of information.

(3) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section shall not be made to anyone other than members of the domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel team and those qualified to receive information as set forth in subdivision (d).

(d) The domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel team may designate persons qualified pursuant to subdivision (b) to be a member of the team for a particular case. A person designated as a team member pursuant to this subdivision may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the confidentiality provisions of subdivision
 (g).

(e) (1) The sharing of information permitted under subdivision (c) shall be governed by protocols developed in each county describing how and what information may be shared by the domestic violence multidisciplinary team to ensure that confidential information gathered by the team is not disclosed in violation of state or federal law. A copy of the protocols shall be distributed to each participating agency and to persons in those agencies who participate in the domestic violence multidisciplinary team.

(2) Members of the team that have confidential information obtained from an individual shall not disclose that information to and with one another unless the member has obtained that individual’s informed, written, reasonably time-limited consent to the
 disclosure, in accordance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, or it is otherwise required by other state or federal law or by court order. Before that consent is obtained, a member of the team is required to inform the individual that the information may be shared with law enforcement professionals or other entities without that individual’s consent if required by law.

(3) A disclosure of information consented to by an individual shall not be deemed a waiver of any privilege or confidentiality provision, including those contained in Sections 2263, 2918, 4982, and 6068 of the Business and Professions Code and in Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(f) Every member of the domestic violence multidisciplinary personnel team who receives information or records
 regarding children or families in his or her capacity as a member of the team shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing the information or records. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under state or federal law.

(h) Information and records communicated or provided to the team members by providers and agencies, as well as information and records created in the course of a domestic violence investigation, shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from
 discovery and disclosure by applicable statutory and common law protections, except where disclosure is required by law. Existing civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the team members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 802, Sec. 3.   (AB 998)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13753.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a city, county, city and county, or community-based nonprofit organization may establish a human trafficking multidisciplinary personnel team consisting of two or more persons who are trained in the prevention, identification, management, or treatment of human trafficking cases and who are qualified to provide a broad range of services related to human trafficking.

(b) A human trafficking multidisciplinary team may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Law enforcement personnel.

(2) Medical personnel.

(3) Psychiatrists, psychologists, marriage and family therapists, or other trained counseling personnel.

(4) District attorneys and city attorneys.

(5) Victim-witness program personnel.

(6) Sexual assault counselors, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code.

(7) Domestic violence counselors, as defined in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code.

(8) Social service agency staff members.

(9) Child welfare agency social workers.

(10) County health department staff.

(11) City or county welfare and public assistance workers.

(12) Nonprofit agency counseling professionals.

(13) Civil legal service providers.

(14) Human trafficking caseworkers, as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, following a report of suspected human trafficking, members of a human
 trafficking multidisciplinary personnel team engaged in the prevention, identification, and treatment of human trafficking may disclose to and exchange with one another information and writings that relate to any incident of human trafficking that may also be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the prevention, identification, or treatment of human trafficking. Any discussion relative to the disclosure or exchange of the information or writings during a team meeting is confidential, and testimony concerning that discussion is not admissible in any criminal, civil, or juvenile court proceeding unless required by law.

(2) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section may occur telephonically or electronically
 if there is adequate verification of the identity of the human trafficking multidisciplinary personnel who are involved in that disclosure or exchange of information.

(3) Disclosure and exchange of information pursuant to this section shall not be made to anyone other than members of the human trafficking multidisciplinary personnel team and those qualified to receive information as set forth in subdivision (d).

(d) The human trafficking multidisciplinary personnel team may designate persons qualified pursuant to subdivision (b) to be a
 member of the team for a particular case. A person designated as a team member pursuant to this subdivision may receive and disclose relevant information and records, subject to the confidentiality provisions of subdivision (g).

(e) (1) The sharing of information permitted under subdivision (c) shall be governed by protocols developed in each county describing how and what information may be shared by the human trafficking multidisciplinary team to ensure that confidential information gathered by the team is not disclosed in violation of state or federal law. A copy of the protocols shall be distributed to each participating agency and to persons in those agencies who participate in the human trafficking multidisciplinary team.

(2) Members
 of the team that have confidential information obtained from an individual shall not disclose that information to and with one another unless the member has obtained that individual’s informed, written, reasonably time-limited consent to the disclosure, in accordance with all applicable state and federal confidentiality laws, or it is otherwise required by other state or federal law or by court order. Before such consent is obtained, a member of the team is required to inform the individual that the information may be shared with law enforcement professionals or other entities without that individual’s consent if required by law.

(3) A disclosure of information consented to by an individual shall not be deemed a waiver of any privilege or confidentiality provision, including those contained in Sections 2263, 2918, 4982, and 6068 of the Business and
 Professions Code and in Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code.

(f) Every member of the human trafficking multidisciplinary personnel team who receives information or records regarding children or families in his or her capacity as a member of the team shall be under the same privacy and confidentiality obligations and subject to the same confidentiality penalties as the person disclosing or providing the information or records. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(g) This section shall not be construed to restrict guarantees of confidentiality provided under state or federal law.

(h) Information and records
 communicated or provided to the team members by providers and agencies, as well as information and records created in the course of a domestic violence investigation, shall be deemed private and confidential and shall be protected from discovery and disclosure by applicable statutory and common law protections, except where disclosure is required by law. Existing civil and criminal penalties shall apply to the inappropriate disclosure of information held by the team members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 802, Sec. 3.   (AB 998)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5.7. REPRODUCTIVE RIGHTS LAW ENFORCEMENT ACT [13775. - 13778.3.]

13775.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Reproductive Rights Law Enforcement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13776.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this title:

(a) “Anti-reproductive-rights crime” means a crime committed partly or wholly because the victim is a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant, or a crime that is partly or wholly intended to intimidate the victim, any other person or entity, or a class of persons or entities from becoming or remaining a reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant. “Anti-reproductive-rights crime” includes, but is not limited to, a violation of subdivision (a), (c), (g), or (h) of Section 423.2.

(b) “Subject matter experts” includes, but is not limited to, the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls, law enforcement agencies experienced
 with anti-reproductive-rights crimes, including the Attorney General and the Department of Justice, and organizations such as the American Civil Liberties Union, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the California Council of Churches, the California Medical Association, the Feminist Majority Foundation, NARAL Pro-Choice California, the National Abortion Federation, the California National Organization for Women, the Planned Parenthood Federation of America, Planned Parenthood Affiliates of California, and the Women’s Health Specialists clinic that represent reproductive health services clients, providers, and assistants.

(c) “Crime of violence,” “nonviolent,” “reproductive health services,” “reproductive health services patient, provider, or assistant,” and “reproductive health services facility” each has the same meaning as set forth in Section
 423.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 8.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13777.

(a) The Attorney General shall do each of the following:

(1) Collect information relating to anti-reproductive-rights crimes, including, but not limited to, the threatened commission of these crimes and persons suspected of committing these crimes or making these threats.

(2) Direct local law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, and elected city attorneys to provide to the Department of Justice, in a manner that the Attorney General prescribes, all of the following on a monthly basis:

(A) The total number of anti-reproductive-rights crime-related calls for assistance made to the department:

(B) The total number of arrests for anti-reproductive-rights crimes, reported by which subdivision of Section 423.2 is the basis for the arrest. The report of each crime that violates any other law shall note the code, section, and subdivision that prohibits the crime. The report of any crime that violates both Section 423.2 and any other law shall note both the subdivision of Section 423.2 and the other code, section, and subdivision that prohibits the crime.

(C) The total number of cases in which the district attorney charged an individual with a crime that violates Section 423.2, including the subdivision that prohibits the crime.

(3) Beginning
 July 1, 2025, report to the Legislature on an annual basis the information collected pursuant to paragraph (2). To avoid production and distribution costs, the Attorney General may submit the reports electronically or as part of any other report that the Attorney General submits.

(4) Develop a plan to prevent, apprehend, prosecute, and report anti-reproductive-rights crimes, and to carry out the legislative intent expressed in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 1 of the act that enacts this title in the 2001–02 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(b) In carrying out their responsibilities under this section, the Attorney General shall consult the Governor, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and other subject matter experts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 47, Sec. 23.   (AB 134)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13777.2.

(a) The Commission on the Status of Women and Girls shall convene an advisory committee consisting of one person appointed by the Attorney General and one person appointed by each of the organizations named in subdivision (b) of Section 13776 that chooses to appoint a member, and any other subject matter experts the commission appoints. The advisory committee shall elect its chair and any other officers of its choice.

(b) The advisory committee shall make two reports, the first by December 31, 2025, and the second by December 31, 2029, to the Committees on Health, Judiciary, and Public Safety of the Senate and Assembly, to the Attorney General, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls. The reports
 shall evaluate the implementation of Chapter 899 of the Statutes of 2001 and any subsequent amendments made to this title and the effectiveness of the plan developed by the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13777. The reports shall also include recommendations regarding any other legislation, and recommendations for any other actions by the Attorney General, Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls.

(c) The Commission on the Status of Women and Girls shall transmit the reports of the advisory committee to the appropriate committees of the Legislature, including, but not limited to, the Committees on Health, Judiciary, and Public Safety in the Senate and Assembly, and make the reports available to the public, including by posting them on the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls’ internet website. To avoid production and distribution costs,
 the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls may submit the reports electronically or as part of any other report that the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls submits to the Legislature.

(d) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training shall make the most updated version of the telecourse that it produced in 2002 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13778 available to the advisory committee. However, before providing the updated telecourse to the advisory committee or otherwise making it public, the commission shall remove the name and face of any person who appears in the telecourse as originally produced who informs the commission in writing that the person has a reasonable apprehension that making the telecourse public without the removal will endanger the person’s life or physical safety.

(e) This section does not require a state agency to pay for
 compensation, travel, or other expenses of any advisory committee member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 10.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13778.

(a) The Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, utilizing available resources, shall develop and, subject to an appropriation of funds for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or other statute, update every seven years, or on a more frequent basis if deemed necessary by either the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls or the Attorney General, an interactive training course on anti-reproductive-rights crimes and make the telecourse available to all California law enforcement agencies through an online portal or platform.

(b) Persons and organizations, including, but not limited to, subject-matter experts, may make application to the commission, as outlined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1051) of
 Division 2 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations, for certification of a course designed to train law enforcement officers to carry out the legislative intent expressed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 1 of the act that enacts this title in the 2001–02 Regular Session.

(c) In developing the telecourse required by subdivision (a), and in considering any applications pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission, utilizing available resources, shall consult the Attorney General and other subject matter experts, except where a subject matter expert has submitted, or has an interest in, an application pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) In addition to producing and making available the telecourse described in subdivision (a), the commission shall distribute, as necessary, training bulletins, via the internet, to law enforcement agencies participating in training
 offered pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 11.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13778.1.

Every law enforcement agency in this state shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies and standards for officers’ responses to anti-reproductive-rights calls by January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 191, Sec. 12.   (AB 1356)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13778.2.

(a) A state or local law enforcement agency or officer shall not knowingly arrest or knowingly participate in the arrest of any person for performing, supporting, or aiding in the performance of a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, or obtaining a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, if the legally protected health care activity is lawful under the laws of this state.

(b) A state or local public agency, or any employee thereof acting in their official capacity, shall not cooperate with or provide information to any individual or agency or department from another state or, to the
 extent permitted by federal law, to a federal law enforcement agency regarding a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, that is lawful under the laws of this state and that is performed in this state.

(c) (1) A law of another state that authorizes the imposition of civil or criminal penalties related to an individual performing, supporting, or aiding in the performance of a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, or an individual obtaining a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, if the legally protected health care activity is lawful under the laws of this state, is against the public policy of this state.

(2) No state court, judicial
 officer, or court employee or clerk, or authorized attorney shall issue a subpoena pursuant to any state law in connection with a proceeding in another state regarding an individual performing, supporting, or aiding in the performance of a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, or an individual obtaining a legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1549.15, in this state, if the legally protected health care activity is lawful under the laws of this state.
